Massachusetts, session 194th, H5130.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the numerical limitations for such licenses that are
imposed upon the Town of East Bridgewater pursuant to Section 17 of Chapter 138 of the
General Laws, or by any other general or special law to the contrary, the East Bridgewater
licensing authority may grant up to four additional licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages
not to be drunk on the premises under Section 15 of said Chapter 138.
SECTION 2. The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted
pursuant to section 1 above, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same location
or different location if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department
of revenue and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the
license is in good standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and
contributions have been paid.
of 2

SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided in this Act, the additional Section 15 licenses
that are allowed hereunder shall be subject to all provisions, restrictions, and requirements of
said Chapter 138.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its passage; or take any other action relative
thereto.
of 2